Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.490

ESD employee attendance incentive program—Remuneration or benefit plan for unused sick leave.

Every educational service district board of directors shall establish an attendance incentive program for all certificated and classified employees in the following manner.

(1) In January of the year following any year in which a minimum of sixty days of leave for illness or injury is accrued, and each January thereafter, any eligible employee may exercise an option to receive remuneration for unused leave for illness or injury accumulated in the previous year at a rate equal to one day's monetary compensation of the employee for each four full days of accrued leave for illness or injury in excess of sixty days. Leave for illness or injury for which compensation has been received shall be deducted from accrued leave for illness or injury at the rate of four days for every one day's monetary compensation. No employee may receive compensation under this section for any portion of leave for illness or injury accumulated at a rate in excess of one day per month.

(2) At the time of separation from educational service district employment due to retirement or death an eligible employee or the employee's estate shall receive remuneration at a rate equal to one day's current monetary compensation of the employee for each four full days accrued leave for illness or injury.

(3) In lieu of remuneration for unused leave for illness or injury as provided for in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, an educational service district board of directors may, with equivalent funds, provide eligible employees a benefit plan that provides reimbursement for medical expenses. Any benefit plan adopted after July 28, 1991, shall require, as a condition of participation under the plan, that the employee sign an agreement with the district to hold the district harmless should the United States government find that the district or the employee is in debt to the United States as a result of the employee not paying income taxes due on the equivalent funds placed into the plan, or as a result of the district not withholding or deducting any tax, assessment, or other payment on such funds as required under federal law.

Moneys or benefits received under this section shall not be included for the purposes of computing a retirement allowance under any public retirement system in this state.

The superintendent of public instruction in its administration hereof, shall promulgate uniform rules and regulations to carry out the purposes of this section.

Should the legislature revoke any benefits granted under this section, no affected employee shall be entitled thereafter to receive such benefits as a matter of contractual right.

[ 1997 c 13 s 7; 1991 c 92 s 1; 1989 c 69 s 1; 1985 c 341 s 9; 1980 c 182 s 6. Formerly RCW 28A.21.360.]

NOTES:

Severability—1980 c 182: See note following RCW 41.04.340.